Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-260.06
Juvenile diversion agreement; contents.

A juvenile diversion agreement shall include, but not be limited to, one or more of the following:

(1) A letter of apology;

(2) Community service, not to be performed during school hours if the juvenile offender is attending school;

(3) Restitution;

(4) Attendance at educational or informational sessions at a community agency;

(5) Requirements to remain during specified hours at home, school, and work and restrictions on leaving or entering specified geographical areas; and

(6) Participation in an appropriate restorative justice practice or service.

Laws 2003, LB 43, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 27.